Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 11 Emergency Medical Services

Cross references.

Aggravated assault on emergency health workers, §

16-5-21

.

Aggravated battery upon an emergency health worker, §

16-5-24

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency Medical Services, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Emergency Preparedness, Subject 511-9-2.

Paramedics and cardiac technicians, Georgia Professional Health Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Composite Medical Board, Chapter 360-11.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).